Utah statutes.
31A-10-202.   Purposes of part.

The purposes of this part are:

(1)  to provide for the continued operation in this state, subject to the provisions of this title, of nontraditional insurers providing annuities to the nonprofit entities and governmental entities of this state and their employees; and

(2)  to specify provisions which equitably deal with the operational, structural, and functional differences between nontraditional insurers and other insurers, without compromising the interests of policyholders.



Amended by Chapter 230, 2003 General Session

